North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 30. Juvenile Records and Social Reports of Delinquency and Undisciplined Cases.

§ 7B-3000.
Juvenile court records. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The clerk shall maintain a complete record of all juvenile cases filed in the clerk’s office to be known as the juvenile record. The record shall include the summons and petition, any secure or nonsecure custody order, any electronic or mechanical recording of hearings, and any written motions, orders, or papers filed in the proceeding.

All juvenile records shall be withheld from public inspection and, except as provided in this subsection, may be examined only by order of the court. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the following persons may examine the juvenile’s record and obtain copies of written parts of the record without an order of the court:

The juvenile or the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

The prosecutor;

Court counselors; and

Probation officers in the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, as provided in subsection (e1) of this section and in G.S. 15A-1341(e).

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the prosecutor may, in the prosecutor’s discretion, share information obtained from a juvenile’s record with magistrates and law enforcement officers sworn in this State, but may not allow a magistrate or law enforcement officer to photocopy any part of the record. A prosecutor shall share information with a victim only as provided in Article 20A of this Chapter and shall not allow a victim to examine or photocopy any part of the record.

The court may direct the clerk to “seal” any portion of a juvenile’s record. The clerk shall secure any sealed portion of a juvenile’s record in an envelope clearly marked “SEALED: MAY BE EXAMINED ONLY BY ORDER OF THE COURT”, or with similar notice, and shall permit examination or copying of sealed portions of a juvenile’s record only pursuant to a court order specifically authorizing inspection or copying.

Any portion of a juvenile’s record consisting of an electronic or mechanical recording of a hearing shall be transcribed only when notice of appeal has been timely given and shall be copied electronically or mechanically, only by order of the court. After the time for appeal has expired with no appeal having been filed, the court may enter a written order directing the clerk to destroy the recording of the hearing, or the recording may be destroyed in accordance with a retention schedule approved by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources under

G.S. 121-5(c)

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the defendant in a criminal proceeding involving a Class A1 misdemeanor or a felony was less than 21 years of age at the time of the offense, information obtained pursuant to subsection (b) of this section regarding the juvenile’s record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a Class A1 misdemeanor or a felony if committed by an adult, where the adjudication occurred after the defendant reached 13 years of age, may be used by law enforcement, the magistrate, the courts, and the prosecutor for pretrial release, plea negotiating decisions, and plea acceptance decisions. Information obtained regarding any juvenile record shall remain confidential and shall not be placed in any public record.

(e1)

When a person is subject to probation supervision under Article 82 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes, for an offense that was committed while the person was less than 25 years of age, that person’s juvenile record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult may be examined without a court order by the probation officer in the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice assigned to supervise the person for the purpose of assessing risk related to supervision.Each judicial district manager in the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall designate a staff person in each county to obtain from the clerk, at the request of the probation officer assigned to supervise the person, any juvenile records authorized to be examined under this subsection. The judicial district manager shall inform the clerk in each county, in writing, of the designated staff person in the county. The designated staff person shall transfer any juvenile records obtained to the probation officer assigned to supervise the person.Any copies of juvenile records obtained pursuant to this subsection shall continue to be withheld from public inspection and shall not become part of the public record in any criminal proceeding. Any copies of juvenile records shall be destroyed within 30 days of termination of the person’s period of probation supervision. Any other information in the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice records, relating to a person’s juvenile record, shall remain confidential and shall be maintained or destroyed pursuant to guidelines established by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for the maintenance and destruction of Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice records.

The juvenile’s record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult may be used in a subsequent criminal proceeding against the juvenile either under

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 404(b), or to prove an aggravating factor at sentencing under G.S. 15A-1340.4(a), 15A-1340.16(d), or 15A-2000(e). The record may be so used only by order of the court in the subsequent criminal proceeding, upon motion of the prosecutor, after an in camera hearing to determine whether the record in question is admissible.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a juvenile’s record shall be destroyed only as authorized by

G.S. 7B-3200

or by rules adopted by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 297; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1995, c. 462, s. 4; c. 509, s. 5; 1997-459, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2002-159, s. 26; 2009-372, s. 1; 2009-545, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (k); 2011-277, s. 1; 2012-83, s. 17; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-158, s. 24; 2017-186, s. 2(m); 2019-216, s. 12.

§ 7B-3000.
Juvenile court records. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The clerk shall maintain a complete record of all juvenile cases filed in the clerk’s office to be known as the juvenile record. The record shall include the summons and petition, any secure or nonsecure custody order, any electronic or mechanical recording of hearings, and any written motions, orders, or papers filed in the proceeding.

All juvenile records shall be withheld from public inspection and, except as provided in this subsection, may be examined only by order of the court. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the following persons may examine the juvenile’s record and obtain copies of written parts of the record without an order of the court:

The juvenile or the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

The prosecutor;

Court counselors; and

Probation officers in the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction, as provided in subsection (e1) of this section and in G.S. 15A-1341(e).

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the prosecutor may, in the prosecutor’s discretion, share information obtained from a juvenile’s record with magistrates and law enforcement officers sworn in this State, but may not allow a magistrate or law enforcement officer to photocopy any part of the record. A prosecutor shall share information with a victim only as provided in Article 20A of this Chapter and shall not allow a victim to examine or photocopy any part of the record.

The court may direct the clerk to “seal” any portion of a juvenile’s record. The clerk shall secure any sealed portion of a juvenile’s record in an envelope clearly marked “SEALED: MAY BE EXAMINED ONLY BY ORDER OF THE COURT”, or with similar notice, and shall permit examination or copying of sealed portions of a juvenile’s record only pursuant to a court order specifically authorizing inspection or copying.

Any portion of a juvenile’s record consisting of an electronic or mechanical recording of a hearing shall be transcribed only when notice of appeal has been timely given and shall be copied electronically or mechanically, only by order of the court. After the time for appeal has expired with no appeal having been filed, the court may enter a written order directing the clerk to destroy the recording of the hearing, or the recording may be destroyed in accordance with a retention schedule approved by the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources under

G.S. 121-5(c)

.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the defendant in a criminal proceeding involving a Class A1 misdemeanor or a felony was less than 21 years of age at the time of the offense, information obtained pursuant to subsection (b) of this section regarding the juvenile’s record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a Class A1 misdemeanor or a felony if committed by an adult, where the adjudication occurred after the defendant reached 13 years of age, may be used by law enforcement, the magistrate, the courts, and the prosecutor for pretrial release, plea negotiating decisions, and plea acceptance decisions. Information obtained regarding any juvenile record shall remain confidential and shall not be placed in any public record.

(e1)

When a person is subject to probation supervision under Article 82 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes, for an offense that was committed while the person was less than 25 years of age, that person’s juvenile record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult may be examined without a court order by the probation officer in the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry assigned to supervise the person for the purpose of assessing risk related to supervision.Each judicial district manager in the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry shall designate a staff person in each county to obtain from the clerk, at the request of the probation officer assigned to supervise the person, any juvenile records authorized to be examined under this subsection. The judicial district manager shall inform the clerk in each county, in writing, of the designated staff person in the county. The designated staff person shall transfer any juvenile records obtained to the probation officer assigned to supervise the person.Any copies of juvenile records obtained pursuant to this subsection shall continue to be withheld from public inspection and shall not become part of the public record in any criminal proceeding. Any copies of juvenile records shall be destroyed within 30 days of termination of the person’s period of probation supervision. Any other information in the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry records, relating to a person’s juvenile record, shall remain confidential and shall be maintained or destroyed pursuant to guidelines established by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources for the maintenance and destruction of Division of Community Supervision and Reentry records.

The juvenile’s record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a Class A, B1, B2, C, D, or E felony if committed by an adult may be used in a subsequent criminal proceeding against the juvenile either under

G.S. 8C-1

, Rule 404(b), or to prove an aggravating factor at sentencing under G.S. 15A-1340.4(a), 15A-1340.16(d), or 15A-2000(e). The record may be so used only by order of the court in the subsequent criminal proceeding, upon motion of the prosecutor, after an in camera hearing to determine whether the record in question is admissible.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, a juvenile’s record shall be destroyed only as authorized by

G.S. 7B-3200

or by rules adopted by the Administrative Office of the Courts.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 297; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1995, c. 462, s. 4; c. 509, s. 5; 1997-459, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2002-159, s. 26; 2009-372, s. 1; 2009-545, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (k); 2011-277, s. 1; 2012-83, s. 17; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-158, s. 24; 2017-186, s. 2(m); 2019-216, s. 12; 2021-180, s. 19C.9(v), (v1).

§ 7B-3001.
Other records relating to juveniles. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The chief court counselor shall maintain a record of all cases of juveniles under supervision of juvenile court counselors, to be known as the juvenile court counselor’s record. The juvenile court counselor’s record shall include the juvenile’s delinquency record; consultations with law enforcement that did not result in the filing of a complaint; family background information; reports of social, medical, psychiatric, or psychological information concerning a juvenile or the juvenile’s family; probation reports; interviews with the juvenile’s family; the results of the gang assessment; or other information the court finds should be protected from public inspection in the best interests of the juvenile.

(a1)

To assist at the time of investigation of an incident that could result in the filing of a complaint, upon request, a juvenile court counselor shall share with a law enforcement officer sworn in this State information from the juvenile court counselor’s record related to a juvenile’s delinquency record or prior consultations with law enforcement. A law enforcement officer may not obtain copies of any part of the record, and all information shared pursuant to this subsection shall be withheld from public inspection as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Unless jurisdiction of the juvenile has been transferred to superior court, all law enforcement records and files concerning a juvenile shall be kept separate from the records and files of adults and shall be withheld from public inspection. The following persons may examine and obtain copies of law enforcement records and files concerning a juvenile without an order of the court:

The juvenile or the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

The prosecutor;

Juvenile court counselors; and

Law enforcement officers sworn in this State.

Otherwise, the records and files may be examined or copied only by order of the court.

All records and files maintained by the Division pursuant to this Chapter shall be withheld from public inspection. The following persons may examine and obtain copies of the Division records and files concerning a juvenile without an order of the court:

The juvenile and the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

Professionals in the agency who are directly involved in the juvenile’s case; and

Juvenile court counselors.

Otherwise, the records and files may be examined or copied only by order of the court. The court may inspect and order the release of records maintained by the Division.

When the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety is authorized to access a juvenile record pursuant to G.S. 7B-3000(e1), the Division may, at the request of the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, notify the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice that there is a juvenile record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult for a person subject to probation supervision under Article 82 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes and may notify the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the county or counties where the adjudication of delinquency occurred.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 297; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1995, c. 462, s. 4; c. 509, s. 5; 1997-459, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-490, s. 2.32; 2009-372, s. 2; 2009-545, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (k), (l); 2017-57, s. 16D.4(x), (ii); 2017-186, s. 2(n); 2017-197, s. 5.4; 2018-142, s. 23(b).

§ 7B-3001.
Other records relating to juveniles. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The chief court counselor shall maintain a record of all cases of juveniles under supervision of juvenile court counselors, to be known as the juvenile court counselor’s record. The juvenile court counselor’s record shall include the juvenile’s delinquency record; consultations with law enforcement that did not result in the filing of a complaint; family background information; reports of social, medical, psychiatric, or psychological information concerning a juvenile or the juvenile’s family; probation reports; interviews with the juvenile’s family; the results of the gang assessment; or other information the court finds should be protected from public inspection in the best interests of the juvenile.

(a1)

To assist at the time of investigation of an incident that could result in the filing of a complaint, upon request, a juvenile court counselor shall share with a law enforcement officer sworn in this State information from the juvenile court counselor’s record related to a juvenile’s delinquency record or prior consultations with law enforcement. A law enforcement officer may not obtain copies of any part of the record, and all information shared pursuant to this subsection shall be withheld from public inspection as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

Unless jurisdiction of the juvenile has been transferred to superior court, all law enforcement records and files concerning a juvenile shall be kept separate from the records and files of adults and shall be withheld from public inspection. The following persons may examine and obtain copies of law enforcement records and files concerning a juvenile without an order of the court:

The juvenile or the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

The prosecutor;

Juvenile court counselors; and

Law enforcement officers sworn in this State.

Otherwise, the records and files may be examined or copied only by order of the court.

All records and files maintained by the Division pursuant to this Chapter shall be withheld from public inspection. The following persons may examine and obtain copies of the Division records and files concerning a juvenile without an order of the court:

The juvenile and the juvenile’s attorney;

The juvenile’s parent, guardian, custodian, or the authorized representative of the juvenile’s parent, guardian, or custodian;

Professionals in the agency who are directly involved in the juvenile’s case; and

Juvenile court counselors.

Otherwise, the records and files may be examined or copied only by order of the court. The court may inspect and order the release of records maintained by the Division.

When the Division of Community Supervision and Reentry of the Department of Adult Correction is authorized to access a juvenile record pursuant to G.S. 7B-3000(e1), the Division may, at the request of the Division of Community of Supervision and Reentry, notify the Division of Community of Supervision and Reentry that there is a juvenile record of an adjudication of delinquency for an offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult for a person subject to probation supervision under Article 82 of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes and may notify the Division of Community of Supervision and Reentry of the county or counties where the adjudication of delinquency occurred.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1987, c. 297; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 7, s. 1; 1995, c. 462, s. 4; c. 509, s. 5; 1997-459, s. 2; 1998-202, s. 6; 2000-137, s. 3; 2001-490, s. 2.32; 2009-372, s. 2; 2009-545, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (k), (l); 2017-57, s. 16D.4(x), (ii); 2017-186, s. 2(n); 2017-197, s. 5.4; 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(v), (v1).